District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Kentrell Devaughn Way Designation Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401, 403a, and 423 of the Street and Alley Closing and
Acquisitions Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official
Code §§ 9-204.01, 9-204.03a, and 9-204.23), the Council symbolically designates 45th Street
NE, between Douglass Street NE and Quarles Street NE, in Ward 7, as “Kentrell Devaughn
Way”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.

The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).